Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-130
Fillmore.

The county of Fillmore is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township five, north, of range four, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township five, north, of range one, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township eight, north, of range one, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township eight, north, of range four, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 20, p. 216;

R.S.1913, § 843;

C.S.1922, § 745;

C.S.1929, § 25-132;

R.S.1943, § 22-130.